Washington statutes.
RCW 35.36.030

Deputies—Exemptions.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the appointment of deputy comptrollers or deputy city clerks in first-class cities to be made in accordance herewith so far as concerns signatures or other doings which may be lawfully made or done by such deputy under the provisions of any other law.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.36.030. Prior: 1929 c 212 s 5; RRS s 9005-9.]